South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3739.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-1-212(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) For purposes of this section, "federal law enforcement officer" means the following persons who are employed as full-time law enforcement officers by the federal government and who are authorized to carry firearms while performing their duties: (1) Federal Bureau of Investigation special agents; (2) Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms special agents; (3) Drug Enforcement Administration special agents; (4) United States Secret Service special agents; (5) United States Customs Service officers; (6) United States Postal Service inspectors; (7) Internal Revenue Service special agents; (8) United States Marshal's Service marshals and deputy marshals; (9) United States Department of Agriculture Forest Service law enforcement officers and special agents; (10) United States Department of Interior Fish and Wildlife special agents; (11) United States National Marine Fisheries special agents; (12) National Park Service Rangers.; (13) Special agents of the Department of Defense, including: (a) Army Criminal Investigation Division; (b) Naval Criminal Investigation Division; (c) Air Force Office of Special Investigations; (d) Defense Criminal Investigative Service. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----